Tennessee, session 114, HB0359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-301, is amended by adding
the following new subsection:
(d)
(1) A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class B misdemeanor.
(2) A second or subsequent violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class A
misdemeanor. Convictions occurring more than ten (10) years prior to the
immediate violation shall not be considered for enhancement purposes under this
subdivision (d)(2).
(3) This subsection (d) does not apply to a violation of § 55-50-351.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts committed on or after that date.
HB0359
002015
- 1 -